California statutes. Financial Code
The commissioner may establish rules which are reasonable and necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Membership Fee and Assessments [17320. - 17324.]

17320.

Fidelity Corporation shall establish and maintain the following funds for payment of claims and for payment of costs of administration: the membership fund, the operations fund, and the fidelity fund.

(a) An applicant or a licensee shall, at the time an application is filed for a license, pay to Fidelity Corporation a membership fee of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each location for which a license is applied. If the application is denied, withdrawn, or abandoned, Fidelity Corporation may retain two hundred dollars ($200) from the membership fee to cover costs of administration.

(1) The membership fund shall be reserved for payment of claims which exceed the fidelity fund balance and for payment of extraordinary
 operational costs.

(2) Any member who, on the effective date of this section, has an account balance which exceeds the three thousand dollars ($3,000) membership fee times the number of its licensed locations shall be credited in a special reserve account for the excess amount. This balance shall be credited against future assessments made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17321 in an amount not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400) per licensed location per year. Any member whose account balance is less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) times the number of its licensed locations shall, on or before December 1, 1988, pay to Fidelity Corporation an amount sufficient to allow the member’s account to be maintained at three thousand dollars ($3,000) times the number of licensed locations. Fidelity Corporation shall provide each member with an accounting of the amounts being reserved for the members’ membership account and amounts being held
 as a special reserve.

(3) The membership fee, less any unpaid assessments and related costs, shall be refunded to the member in accordance with Fidelity Corporation’s bylaws not less than 30 months and no more than 36 months after the effective date of surrender of a license.

(4) Any member who does not engage in any escrow transactions pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17312 may terminate its membership in Fidelity Corporation by written notice to Fidelity Corporation and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, as provided in the Fidelity Corporation’s bylaws and rules and regulations. The membership fee, less any unpaid assessments and related costs, shall be refunded to the member in accordance with Fidelity Corporation’s bylaws not less than 30 months and no more than 36 months after the effective date of the member’s written request to terminate its
 membership in Fidelity Corporation. Before a licensee resumes those escrow transactions, it shall first be required to become a member of Fidelity Corporation, as provided in this subdivision.

(b) Fidelity Corporation shall prepare, prior to its fiscal year end, an estimated annual operational budget projecting the costs of operations and administration for the succeeding fiscal year, excluding the amount paid for claims and premiums paid for excess coverage bonding. The amount of the assessment shall be 150 percent of the budgetary projection. In succeeding years, the assessment shall be adjusted by adding the prior year’s deficit or deducting unused surplus from the prior year.

(c) Fidelity Corporation shall establish a fidelity fund for the payment of claims and for the payment of the premium for the fidelity bond or insurance policy, if any. All claims shall be paid from the
 fidelity fund, provided that, to the extent that the fidelity fund balance is not sufficient to pay claims, the claim shall be paid from the membership fund by charging each member’s membership account a pro rata share of the excess.

(d) All interest earned on the membership fund and the operations fund shall be credited to the fidelity fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 124.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17321.

Fidelity Corporation shall bill and collect from each member an annual premium that in the aggregate shall consist of assessments for the operations fund and the fidelity fund.

(a) The annual assessment for the operations fund shall be assessed no later than October 15 of each year for the current fiscal year in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17320. The payment of any invoice for assessments under this subdivision is payable by the member escrow agent in three equal and consecutive
 monthly installments with the first installment payable at or within 30 days after receipt of the Fidelity Corporation invoice. The assessment shall include:

(1) All costs and expenses of administration as budgeted by the board of directors for the current fiscal year.

(2) Any expenses actually incurred in the preceding fiscal year which exceeded the budgeted costs of expenses and administration except for expenses recovered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17321.1.

Each member’s assessment shall be determined pro rata based upon the ratio of each member’s licensed locations to the total licensed locations of all members as of the preceding June 30.

Members licensed on or after July 1 of each year shall be assessed only for costs and expenses pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision.
 This assessment shall be prorated on a monthly basis.

(b) The annual assessment for the fidelity fund shall be assessed no later than May 1. The assessment shall include any amount necessary to replenish the membership fund pursuant to Section 17324, and shall be based upon the balances of the membership fund and the fidelity fund as of December 31 of the previous year and the escrow liability schedule of each licensed location as provided in Section 17348, and shall be calculated as follows:

(1) If the membership fund and fidelity fund in the aggregate equal an amount less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), or if the balance in the fidelity fund is less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), then the assessment shall be the greater of: (A) the amount necessary to bring the membership fund and fidelity fund in the aggregate up to five million dollars
 ($5,000,000), but not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per assessment, or (B) the amount necessary to maintain a minimum fidelity fund balance of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), including the amount of the assessment, or (C) four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(2) If the membership fund and fidelity fund in the aggregate equal an amount that is at least five million dollars ($5,000,000), and the balance in the fidelity fund is at least two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000), then the assessment shall be four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

Each member’s fidelity fund assessment for paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be the amount derived by multiplying the amount to be assessed by the ratio that each member’s risk factors bear to the total of all members’ risk factors.

A member’s risk factors shall be
 computed in accordance with the following formula, except that the total factors of a member shall be reduced by one for each licensed branch location:Coverage per
 Licensed Location
 Factors$1,000,0003$2,000,0005$3,000,0007$4,000,0008$5,000,0009(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the assessment for the fidelity fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, shall be made immediately upon 90-day notice of cancellation of the fidelity bond or insurance policy permitted by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 17310, but in no event later than 60 days prior to the date of cancellation.

(d) Every licensed member as of March 31 shall pay the fidelity fund assessment, without any pro rata adjustment, notwithstanding that the member may have surrendered a license or have a license revoked prior to the date that the assessment is mailed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 180, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17321.1.

Fidelity Corporation shall levy a special assessment against its members whenever:

(a) Deemed necessary by the board of directors in the event of any extraordinary expenses which would seriously deplete the resources of the operations fund; or

(b) A proof of loss has been submitted by a member which, if paid during that fiscal year, would reduce the membership fund by 10 percent or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 15.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17321.2.

Fidelity Corporation shall be entitled to collect late fees as specified in Fidelity Corporation’s bylaws for any late payment of assessments under Section 17320, 17321, or 17321.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 16.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17322.

Fidelity Corporation shall report to the commissioner each levy of assessment within 10 business days after the levy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 18.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17323.

(a) In the event any member fails to pay an assessment when due, Fidelity Corporation shall by written demand addressed to the member request the payment of the assessment within 30 days of the demand letter. If the member fails to pay an assessment, the commissioner may issue an order pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) If a member fails to pay the assessment, or any applicable late fee, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend the license issued to the company. If after the order is made, a request for a hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held
 within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its license is suspended, a company shall not conduct business pursuant to this division, except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the suspension of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(c) Fidelity Corporation may bring an action at law or in equity against the member to recover any assessment or fees.

(d) Fidelity Corporation may be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, if it prevails in any action against a member, or against a third party, except the commissioner, to enforce a claim against the bond or other security posted by the member pursuant to Section 17202, or in any action against a member pursuant to subdivision (c). Those costs and attorney’s fees may be awarded as an item of
 costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, provided that the payment of the costs and attorney’s fees will not cause the member to be in violation of Section 17202, 17202.1, or 17210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1431, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17324.

Any reduction in the membership fund caused by payment of an extraordinary expense pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17320 or payment of claims pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17320 shall be replenished by the operations fund or the fidelity fund, as appropriate. The next assessment for the operations fund or the fidelity fund, as appropriate, shall include an amount necessary for that replenishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 20.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Provisions [17330. - 17350.]

17330.

Any member or successor in interest who suffers a loss may file a claim with Fidelity Corporation for the amount of the loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 21.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17331.

(a) An applicant applying for licensure as an escrow agent under this division is required to apply for a Fidelity Corporation Certificate, prepared and issued by Fidelity Corporation, for each proposed shareholder, officer, director, trustee, manager, or employee who is to be directly or indirectly compensated by the escrow agent, prior to licensure of the escrow agent by the commissioner.

(b) A shareholder, officer, director, trustee, manager, or employee of an escrow agent, directly or indirectly compensated by an escrow agent within this state, is required to complete and execute a Fidelity Corporation Certificate application, prepared and issued by Fidelity Corporation, as a
 condition of their employment or entitlement to compensation, before the person may continue the regular discharge of their duties, or have access to moneys or negotiable securities belonging to or in the possession of the escrow agent, or draw checks upon the escrow agent or the trust funds of the escrow agent.

(c) Fidelity Corporation Certificates may also be known as Escrow Agent’s Fidelity Corporation Certificates or EAFC Certificates. The certificate at all times remains the property of Fidelity Corporation, and is not transferable by either a member or employee. The certificate is not a warranty or guarantee by Fidelity Corporation of the integrity, veracity, or competence of the person.

(d) An application for a Fidelity Corporation Certificate shall be in writing
 and in the form prescribed by Fidelity Corporation. The application may include (1) a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), (2) two passport-size photographs, and (3) a set of fingerprint images and related information using the process established by the Department of Justice for requesting state summary criminal history information, plus the fee charged by the Department of Justice for processing noncriminal applicant fingerprint images and related information, in a manner established by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (l). The Department of Justice shall honor the Fidelity Corporation report request form and issue a report to Fidelity Corporation, notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary. Fidelity Corporation is also entitled to submit a set of fingerprint images and related information in the Department of Justice specified noncriminal applicant
 fingerprint format for the purpose of requesting and obtaining a report from the Department of Justice, for the officers and employees of Fidelity Corporation. A member shall cause the filing of applications for all existing employees as required by this section within 30 days of written notice by Fidelity Corporation to the member.

(e) The application form shall include a provision for binding arbitration to allow for arbitration of any appeal or dispute as to a decision by Fidelity Corporation concerning the certificate, as follows:

A DISPUTE AS TO WHETHER THE DENIAL OF THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION OR ANY SUBSEQUENT SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE CERTIFICATE IS UNNECESSARY OR UNAUTHORIZED OR WAS IMPROPERLY, NEGLIGENTLY, OR UNLAWFULLY RENDERED, MAY BE DETERMINED BY SUBMISSION TO ARBITRATION
 AS PROVIDED BY CALIFORNIA LAW, AND NOT BY A LAWSUIT OR RESORT TO COURT PROCESS EXCEPT AS CALIFORNIA LAW PROVIDES FOR JUDICIAL REVIEW OF ARBITRATION PROCEEDINGS OR EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 17331.3 OF THE FINANCIAL CODE. THE APPLICANT MAY, SUBJECT TO AGREEMENT, SUBMIT ANY ISSUE ARISING FROM A DECISION BY FIDELITY CORPORATION TO DENY THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION OR TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE CERTIFICATE TO BE DECIDED BY BINDING NEUTRAL ARBITRATION. UPON AN AGREEMENT TO SUBMIT TO BINDING NEUTRAL ARBITRATION, THE APPLICANT HAS NO RIGHT TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE CONCERNING THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION LITIGATED IN A COURT OR JURY TRIAL NOR ANY JUDICIAL RIGHTS TO DISCOVERY AND APPEAL, EXCEPT AS SPECIFICALLY PROVIDED IN THE ESCROW LAW. ARBITRATION MAY BE COMPELLED AS PROVIDED BY LAW. 

(f) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for statements made by Fidelity Corporation in reports or recommendations made pursuant to this division, or for reports or recommendations made pursuant to this division to Fidelity Corporation by its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, unless the information provided is false and the party
 making the statement or providing the false information does so with knowledge and malice. Reports or recommendations made pursuant to this section, or Section 17331.1, 17331.2, or 17331.3, are not public documents.

(g) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or an officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for the release of any information furnished to Fidelity Corporation pursuant to this section unless the information released is false and the party, including Fidelity Corporation, its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the state, the Department of Financial Protection
 and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, who releases the false information does so with knowledge and malice.

(h) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its directors, officers, employees, or agents, for any decision to deny an application for a certificate or to suspend or revoke the certificate of any person or for the timing of any decision or the timing of any notice to persons or members thereof, or for any failure to deny an application under subdivision (a) of Section 17331.2. This subdivision does not apply to acts performed in bad faith or with malice.

(i) Fidelity Corporation, any member of Fidelity Corporation, an
 agent of Fidelity Corporation or of its members, or any person who uses any information obtained under this section for any purpose not authorized by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(j) Section 17331, 17331.1, or 17331.2 does not constitute a restriction or limitation upon the obligation of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify members against loss, as provided in Sections 17310 and 17314. The failure to obtain a certificate, the denial of an application for a certificate, or the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of a certificate does not limit the obligation of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify a member against loss.

(k) Notwithstanding Section 11105 of the Penal Code, Fidelity Corporation is entitled to receive state summary criminal history information and subsequent arrest
 notification from the Department of Justice as a result of fingerprint images and related information submitted to the Department of Justice by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 17209, Section 17212.1, and subdivision (d) of Section 17414.1, by or on behalf of escrow agents, shareholders, officers, directors, trustees, managers, or employees of an escrow agent, directly or indirectly compensated by an escrow agent. The Department of Justice and Fidelity Corporation shall enter into an agreement to implement this subdivision. The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall forward to Fidelity Corporation, weekly, a list of names of individual fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice.

(l) (1) The Department of Financial Protection and
 Innovation
 shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for licensed escrow agents pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to Fidelity Corporation pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 12.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17331.1.

(a) Any person not previously issued a certificate must, upon employment with an escrow agent within this state, apply to Fidelity Corporation for a certificate. The member shall submit all applications for certificates to Fidelity Corporation within 10 business days of the date of employment. The person may continue employment until or unless denied a certificate by Fidelity Corporation. 

(b) Upon written notice by Fidelity Corporation to any or all members that any person
 has been denied a certificate, or has had a certificate suspended, canceled, or revoked, no member or person acting on behalf of a member shall authorize that person to have access to money or negotiable securities belonging to or in the possession of the escrow agent, or to draw checks upon the escrow agent or the trust accounts of the escrow agent. Any member or person who commits or who causes a violation of this section, which violation was either known or should have been known by the member or the person committing or causing the violation, may be subject to action by the commissioner and Fidelity Corporation as provided for in this division.

(c) Each member and each person required to have a certificate shall comply with the Fidelity Corporation rules, to be approved by the commissioner, concerning the manner and timing within which Fidelity Corporation shall receive notice of employment, change of the person’s name, mailing address, or
 employment status, the certificate form, and the procedures for the administration thereof. Fidelity Corporation may collect a fee to cover the cost of processing the notices but no fee shall exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) Fidelity Corporation shall assess the member a penalty at the rate of twenty-five dollars ($25) for every day that the member has not fully complied with this section, Section 17331, or Section 17331.2.

(e) Any member that suffers a loss of trust obligations caused by any person who is required to have a certificate but has (1) failed to apply for a certificate, (2) has had the application for a certificate denied, (3) has a suspended certificate, or (4) whose certificate has been revoked shall be obligated to pay a deductible in the amount of 100 percent of the amount of the loss, notwithstanding the amount of the statutory deductible as prescribed by
 Section 17314.3. The failure to obtain a certificate, the denial of an application for a certificate, or the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of a certificate shall not limit the obligation of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify a member against loss of trust obligations as defined in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 180, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17331.2.

(a) Fidelity Corporation shall deny the application for a certificate or revoke the certificate of any person, upon any of the following grounds:

(1) The application contains a material misrepresentation of fact or fails to disclose a material fact so as to render the application false or misleading, or if any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the original application for a certificate, reasonably would have warranted Fidelity Corporation to
 refuse originally to issue that certificate.

(2) That the person has been convicted of a crime or offense, whether a felony, an offense punishable as a felony, or a misdemeanor, that involved dishonesty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, misappropriation of property, or any other crime reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division. A conviction within the meaning of this section is a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. A conviction also includes an order granting probation and suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. If,
 however, the conviction is more than 10 years old, or the conviction has been expunged, or the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation or relief under Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code, or if the conviction was an infraction, then the person may have a Fidelity Corporation certificate upon showing by clear and convincing proof to a reasonable certainty that the conviction is no longer reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division or that person’s employment with a member.

(3) That the person has been held liable in a civil action by final judgment of any court if the judgment involved dishonesty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property or the person has been ordered to make restitution to a victim in any criminal case involving a crime or offense set forth in paragraph (2). The person may have a
 Fidelity Corporation certificate upon showing by clear and convincing proof to a reasonable certainty that the judgment or restitution order is no longer reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division or that person’s employment with a member.

(4) That the person has (A) committed or caused to be committed an act which caused any member to suffer a loss; (B) committed or caused to be committed or colluded with any other person committing any act which caused a loss, for which Fidelity Corporation or the insurer on any insurance policy or fidelity bond purchased by Fidelity Corporation, or both, to become liable to indemnify any member; or (C) committed or caused to be committed an act of dishonesty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property, to the material damage of a member or for which the member has been held liable to
 any third party, by final judgment.

(5) That the person has been barred from employment by final order of the commissioner pursuant to Section 17423.

(6) That the person has been deemed not qualified to serve in any capacity as a director or officer or in any other position involving management duties with a financial institution, pursuant to Division 1.8 (commencing with Section 4990).

(7) That the person has been denied coverage or reinstatement by any insurer under any fidelity bond or crime policy, unless a decision of reinstatement of coverage has been made after that denial. A person who obtained a decision of reinstatement of coverage prior to the effective date of this section may have a Fidelity Corporation certificate notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), unless any other ground for denial or revocation
 applies to that person.

(b) Fidelity Corporation shall suspend the certificate of any person upon either of the following grounds:

(1) That the person has been censured or suspended from any position of employment by final order of the commissioner. The certificate suspension shall be for a term concurrent with the final order of the commissioner.

(2) That the person has been barred from any position of employment or management or control of any escrow agent, for a term of less than permanent, by final order of the commissioner. The certificate suspension shall be for a term concurrent with the final order of the commissioner.

(c) Fidelity Corporation may suspend the certificate of any person under either of the following grounds:

(1) That there is an action commenced by the commissioner to either suspend or bar that person, under Section 17423.

(2) That any member with whom the person was employed has given a proof of loss or a notice of an occurrence which may give rise to a claim for a loss of trust obligations either of which identifies the person as the person responsible for the loss or as a person acting in collusion with the person causing the loss.

(d) Upon denial of an application for, or upon suspension or revocation of the certificate of any person, Fidelity Corporation shall provide written notice to the member with whom that person is employed of the decision, pending any appeal therefrom which might be made. Thereafter, the member shall not allow that person to have access to money or negotiable instruments or securities belonging
 to or in the possession of the escrow agent, or to draw checks upon the escrow agent or the trust accounts of the escrow agent, but that person may otherwise continue in the performance and discharge of other duties of an employee. Fidelity Corporation shall notify the person in writing of the decision to deny, suspend, or revoke the certificate and of the person’s right of appeal, together with the notice of appeal. The grounds and basis for the decision shall be stated in the notice thereof. All notices may be served either personally or by mail, properly addressed to the address of record for the member and the person.

(e) Any person whose application for a certificate has been denied, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked, may appeal the decision, as provided in Section 17331.3. While that appeal is pending, the person may not have access to money or negotiable instruments or securities belonging to or in the possession of the
 escrow agent, or to draw checks upon the escrow agent or the trust accounts of the escrow agent, but that person may otherwise continue in the performance and discharge of other duties of an employee pending final decision of that person’s appeal. Failure to remove the person whose application has been denied, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked, as a signer on the trust accounts may be subject to action by the commissioner as provided for in this division and shall be subject to penalties as set forth in Section 17331.1.

(f) Upon expiration of the time for an appeal, or upon conclusion of the appeal, the decision to deny an application for or to suspend or revoke the certificate of any person shall become final. Fidelity Corporation shall give written notice to the member and to the person of the final decision within 10 days. Thereafter, Fidelity Corporation shall disclose in writing to all members the identity of persons whose
 application has been denied or whose certificate has been revoked. The person whose certificate has been denied or revoked may file a certificate reapplication after the period of time specified in Section 11522 of the Government Code, dating from the Fidelity Corporation final decision, provided that the person has satisfied all obligations to Fidelity Corporation under any prior arbitration award or judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17331.3.

(a) Notice to the person, and to the member with whom the person is employed, of the decision to deny an application for or to revoke or suspend a Fidelity Corporation Certificate, shall be effective immediately upon personal delivery, or by facsimile if written acknowledgment of receipt by the member and the person is returned by facsimile, or within five days of the date of mailing, and shall become final upon expiration of the time for filing a notice of appeal or upon the conclusion of the appeal, as provided for in this section. 

(b) The person whose application
 for a certificate has been denied, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked may, within 15 days after notice of the decision, file with Fidelity Corporation a notice of appeal and request for a hearing, by binding arbitration or judicial action, as provided herein. Neither the notice of appeal nor the request for a hearing shall stay the decision of Fidelity Corporation under Section 17331.2. A late notice of appeal and request for a hearing may be accepted upon a showing of good cause. 

(c) The hearing for the appeal may be resolved by arbitration in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1280) of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The notice of the person’s right to appeal and notice of appeal provided by Fidelity Corporation shall contain a schedule of proposed arbitrators or of a proposed arbitration forum which provides a panel of arbitrators and method for appointing an arbitrator. The person filing
 the notice of arbitration may agree to submit the decision and matter to binding arbitration and accept an arbitrator whose name appears on the notice or may propose, in writing, an alternative arbitrator, but if Fidelity Corporation does not notify the person of acceptance of the proposed alternative arbitrator within 10 days, then either party may within 30 days petition the court to appoint an arbitrator, as provided by law. 

(d) If the person does not agree to submit the decision and matter to binding arbitration, then the person may, within 30 days after the notice of the decision, file an action in superior court concerning the decision to deny an application for, or to suspend or revoke the certificate. The court may, on its own motion, or shall, upon the filing of an election by any or either party, order that the action be submitted to arbitration pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the
 Code of Civil Procedure, in which case the action shall be accorded that priority for hearing as circumstances permit, unless the plaintiff may otherwise request. 

(e) Either Fidelity Corporation or the person whose application for a certificate has been denied, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked, may apply to the superior court for relief to compel compliance with this section in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(f) Upon the conclusion of the hearing on appeal, either the arbitrator or the court may in its discretion award to the prevailing party as an item of costs, reasonable attorneys’ fees, and costs. All other expenses and fees for the arbitration incurred prior to the decision of the arbitrator or confirmation of the decision by the court shall be shared equally by the parties
 except for attorneys’ fees, witness fees or other expenses incurred by either party for his or her own benefit. 

(g) Upon the filing of any action in the superior court by the person whose application for a certificate has been denied, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked, Fidelity Corporation at any time within 30 days after service of the summons may upon notice and hearing, move the court for an order requiring the plaintiff to furnish an undertaking to secure an award of costs and attorneys’ fees which may be awarded in the action. The motion shall be supported by affidavit showing that the action filed is frivolous and that there is no reasonable possibility that the prosecution of the action will benefit the plaintiff and that the moving party fully complied with this section and Section 17331.2. 

At the hearing upon the motion, the court shall consider any written or oral evidence,
 by witnesses or affidavit, as may be material (1) to the ground or grounds upon which the motion is based, or (2) to a determination of the probable reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, of the defendant and the moving party, which will be incurred in the defense of the action. 

If the court determines, after hearing the evidence adduced by the parties, that the moving party has established a probability in support of any of the grounds upon which the motion is based, the court shall fix the amount of the undertaking, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), to be furnished by the plaintiff for reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, which may be incurred by the moving party in connection with the action. 

A ruling by the court on the motion shall not be a determination of any issue in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon the motion, makes a determination that a bond shall
 be furnished by the plaintiff, the action shall be dismissed as to the defendant, unless the bond required by the court has been furnished within a reasonable time as may be fixed by the court. Upon the filing of a motion pursuant to this subdivision, no other pleadings need be filed by the defendant and the prosecution of the action shall be stayed until 10 days after the motion has been disposed of. The motion shall be considered pursuant to this subdivision and in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 995.010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1217, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

17332.

When either Fidelity Corporation or the insurer providing the fidelity bond or insurance policy, if any, under Section 17310, or both, pay an obligation on behalf of a member, Fidelity Corporation and the insurer shall be subrogated to the rights, claims, and remedies of the member up to the amount paid by Fidelity Corporation and the insurer on behalf of the member. Independent of any duty or obligation of Fidelity Corporation, the member shall do nothing to prejudice those rights. In any subrogation action filed by Fidelity Corporation, the provider of the
 fidelity bond or insurance policy if payment was made thereunder, or both, Fidelity Corporation shall have the first right to the proceeds of any judgment or settlement obtained against the principal obligors and any other party who is held liable jointly or severally, in whole or in part, with the principal obligors, up to the amount actually paid on the claim by Fidelity Corporation. Fidelity Corporation and the insurer, as subrogees, shall also recover in the subrogation action reasonable costs and attorney’s fees which may be awarded either as part of any judgment or as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. No member engaged in business pursuant to Section 17200 shall be required to pay those costs and attorney’s fees awarded pursuant to this section. Amounts recouped by Fidelity Corporation through subrogation, minus all costs, attorney’s fees, and other administrative expenses
 incurred in obtaining that recovery, shall be credited to the fidelity fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 180, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17333.
